Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2144
Community Development Law; controlling over other laws and city charters.

The Community Development Law shall be full authority for the creation of a community redevelopment authority by a city or village, and for the exercise of the powers therein granted to a city or village and to such authority, and shall also be full authority for the creation of a community development agency by a city or village, and for the exercise of the powers therein granted to a city or village for such purpose, and no action, proceeding, or election shall be required prior to the creation of a community redevelopment authority or community development agency or to authorize the exercise of any of the powers granted in the Community Development Law, except as specifically provided in the Community Development Law, any provision of law or of any city charter or village law to the contrary notwithstanding.

No proceedings for the issuance of bonds of an authority or of a city or village for its community development agency shall be required other than those required by the Community Development Law; and the provisions of all other laws and city charters, if any, relative to the terms and conditions for the issuance, payment, redemption, registration, sale or delivery of bonds of public bodies, corporations, or political subdivisions of this state shall not be applicable to bonds issued by an authority pursuant to the Community Development Law.

Insofar as the provisions of the Community Development Law are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or of any city charter, if any, the provisions of the Community Development Law shall be controlling.

Laws 1957, c. 52, § 15, p. 261;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 18, p. 243;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2644;

Laws 1973, LB 299, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 32.